New Mexico, session 2026, HB42.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the aging and long-term services department for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 to contract for the provision of frozen food, including medically tailored food, in communities with high food insecurity, limited access to healthy food and a subpopulation of persons with medical conditions requiring special meals. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. - 2 -